ro-RO: Configurația zurgălăilor tamburinei: Rând dublu; Talere ciocănite; Mixt/combinație; Rând simplu; Talere netede; Rând triplu; Talere cu fante; Altele
sv: Tamburinens bjällerkonfiguration: Dubbel rad; Hamrade bleck; Blandad/kombination; Enkel rad; Släta bleck; Trippel rad; Ventilerade bleck; Annat
nl: Tamboerijn schellenconfiguratie: Dubbele rij; Gehamerde schellen; Gemengd/combinatie; Enkele rij; Gladde schellen; Drievoudige rij; Geperforeerde schellen; Overig
da: Jinglekonfiguration for tamburin: Dobbelt række; Hamrede bjælder; Blandet/kombination; Enkelt række; Glatte bjælder; Tredobbelt række; Ventilerede bjælder; Andet
zh-CN: 铃鼓钹片配置: 双排; 锤打铃片; 混合/组合; 单排; 光滑铃片; 三排; 通风铃片; 其他
pt-PT: Configuração das soalhas da pandeireta: Fila dupla; Soalhas marteladas; Misto/combinação; Fila simples; Soalhas lisas; Fila tripla; Soalhas com aberturas; Outro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia zvonkohier na tamburíne: Dvojradové; Tepané pliešky; Zmiešané/kombinované; Jednoradové; Hladké pliešky; Trojradové; Pliešky s otvormi; Iné
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kraguljčkov tamburina: Dvojna vrsta; Kovani rožljajčki; Mešano/kombinacija; Enojna vrsta; Gladki rožljajčki; Trojna vrsta; Rožljajčki z zračniki; Drugo
hr-HR: Konfiguracija zvečki na tamburinu: Dvostruki red; Kovani zvončići; Mješovito/kombinacija; Jednostruki red; Glatki zvončići; Trostruki red; Zvončići s otvorima; Ostalo
es: Configuración de la sonaja de la pandereta: Doble fila; Sonajas martilladas; Mixta/combinación; Fila única; Sonajas lisas; Triple fila; Sonajas ventiladas; Otra
fi: Tamburiinin helistinasetelma: Kaksirivinen; Taotut helistimet; Sekoitettu/yhdistelmä; Yksirivinen; Sileät helistimet; Kolmirivinen; Rei'itetyt helistimet; Muu
th: การกำหนดค่าเสียงกระดิ่งแทมบูรีน: แถวคู่; แฉแบบตอก; แบบผสม/รวม; แถวเดี่ยว; แฉแบบเรียบ; สามแถว; แฉแบบมีรูระบาย; อื่นๆ
tr: Tef zil düzeni: Çift sıra; Dövme ziller; Karma/kombinasyon; Tek sıra; Düz ziller; Üç sıra; Delikli ziller; Diğer
pt-BR: Pandeiro configuração das platinelas: Fileira dupla; Platinelas marteladas; Misto/combinação; Fileira única; Platinelas lisas; Fileira tripla; Platinelas ventiladas; Outro
fr: Configuration des cymbalettes du tambourin: Double rangée; Cymbalettes martelées; Mixte/combinaison; Simple rangée; Cymbalettes lisses; Triple rangée; Cymbalettes ventilées; Autre
de: Schellenkonfiguration des Tamburins: Doppelreihig; Gehämmerte Schellen; Gemischt/Kombination; Einreihig; Glatte Schellen; Dreireihig; Gelochte Schellen; Sonstige
cs: Konfigurace činelek na tamburíně: Dvouřadé; Tepané plíšky; Smíšené / kombinované; Jednořadé; Hladké plíšky; Třířadé; Perforované plíšky; Jiné
el: Διαμόρφωση κουδουνίσματος ντέφι: Διπλή σειρά; Σφυρήλατες ζίλιες; Μεικτό/συνδυασμός; Μονή σειρά; Λείες ζίλιες; Τριπλή σειρά; Ζίλιες με οπές; Άλλο
en: Tambourine jingle configuration: Double row; Hammered jingles; Mixed/combination; Single row; Smooth jingles; Triple row; Vented jingles; Other
zh-TW: 鈴鼓銅鈸配置: 雙排; 錘打鈴片; 混合/組合; 單排; 平滑鈴片; 三排; 開孔鈴片; 其他
it: Configurazione del sonagli del tamburello: Doppia fila; Sonagli martellati; Mista/combinazione; Fila singola; Sonagli lisci; Tripla fila; Sonagli forati; Altro
vi: Cấu hình chuông trống lắc: Hàng đôi; Chũm chọe gò; Hỗn hợp/kết hợp; Hàng đơn; Chũm chọe trơn; Hàng ba; Chũm chọe có lỗ thông; Khác
bg-BG: Конфигурация на металните звънчета на дайрето: Двоен ред; Ковани зилове; Смесени/комбинирани; Единичен ред; Гладки зилове; Троен ред; Зилове с отвори; Друго
pl: Konfiguracja blaszek tamburynu: Dwurzędowe; Kute dzwonki; Mieszane / kombinowane; Jednorzędowe; Gładkie dzwonki; Trzyrzędowe; Wentylowane dzwonki; Inne
nb: Konfigurasjon av tamburinjingel: Dobbel rad; Hamrede bjeller; Blandet/kombinasjon; Enkel rad; Glatte bjeller; Trippel rad; Ventilerte bjeller; Annet
lt-LT: Tambūrino žvangučių išdėstymas: Dvi eilės; Kaltiniai žvangučiai; Mišrūs / kombinuoti; Viena eilė; Lygūs žvangučiai; Trys eilės; Žvangučiai su angomis; Kita
ru: Конфигурация джинглов тамбурина: Двухрядный; Кованые джинглы; Смешанный/комбинированный; Однорядный; Гладкие джинглы; Трёхрядный; Джинглы с отверстиями; Другое
ja: タンバリンジングル構成: ダブルロー; ハンマードジングル; ミックス/組み合わせ; シングルロー; スムースジングル; トリプルロー; ベンテッドジングル; その他
hu: Tamburincsengettyűk konfigurációja: Kétsoros; Kalapált csörgők; Kevert / kombinált; Egysoros; Sima csörgők; Háromsoros; Nyílásos csörgők; Egyéb
ko: 탬버린 징글 구성: 2열; 해머드 징글; 혼합형; 1열; 스무스 징글; 3열; 벤티드 징글; 기타